Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1154.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1325. Open safety recall notice.(a) Determination of open safety recall.--The department shall determine if a vehicle for which registration is sought, or renewal of registration is required, has an open safety recall prior to issuing a registration or sending the application for renewal of registration. If an open safety recall exists for the vehicle, the department shall include a notice when issuing the registration or sending the application for renewal of registration that the vehicle has an open safety recall.(b) Contents of notice.--The notice shall include:123456789101112131415161718 (1) Information on where the owner can get more details on the open safety recall, including a publicly accessible Internet website address maintained by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.(2) A statement that the repairs may be made without cost to the owner at a location approved by the manufacturer of the vehicle.(3) Any additional information deemed appropriate by the department.(c) Monthly renewal.--The department shall include an informational insert regarding open safety recalls with all driver's license and vehicle registration renewal notices mailed by the department. The insert shall:(1) Use recall-related public safety messaging consistent with the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.(2) Provide a publicly accessible Internet website and clear instructions for vehicle owners to check their vehicle recall status.(d) Online registration portal notice.--The department shall display information regarding open safety recalls on its online registration renewal portal. The information shall:(1) Include a direct link that allows vehicle owners to check whether their vehicles have an open safety recall.(2) Be displayed to every vehicle owner that initiates an online registration renewal transaction.(e) Public awareness and outreach.--The department shall conduct ongoing public awareness activities to inform vehicle owners of the importance of proactively checking for and addressing open safety recalls. The public awareness activities 20260SB1154PN1413 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be conducted no fewer than twice per year. The activities shall include:(1) Periodic distribution of vehicle recall safety messages through the department's existing communication channels that include:(i) social media;(ii) electronic notifications;(iii) website postings; or(iv) other public outreach tools utilized by the department.(2) Messaging consistent with recall-related public safety guidance published by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.(3) Any additional public awareness activities the department deems necessary.(f) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "open safety recall" means a safety-related recall for which notification by a manufacturer is required to be provided under 49 U.S.C. §§ 30118 (relating to notification of defects and noncompliance) and 30119 (relating to notification procedures).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1154PN1413 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021